Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-806
Division; powers and duties; rules and regulations.

(1) The division shall act as the chief behavioral health authority for the State of Nebraska and shall direct the administration and coordination of the public behavioral health system, including, but not limited to: (a) Administration and management of the division, regional centers, and any other facilities and programs operated by the division; (b) integration and coordination of the public behavioral health system; (c) comprehensive statewide planning for the provision of an appropriate array of community-based behavioral health services and continuum of care; (d) coordination and oversight of regional behavioral health authorities, including approval of regional budgets and audits of regional behavioral health authorities; (e) development and management of data and information systems; (f) prioritization and approval of all expenditures of funds received and administered by the division, including: The establishment of rates to be paid; reimbursement methodologies for behavioral health services; methodologies to be used by regional behavioral health authorities in determining a consumer's financial eligibility as provided in subsection (2) of section 71-809; and fees and copays to be paid by consumers of such services; (g) cooperation with the department in the licensure and regulation of behavioral health professionals, programs, and facilities; (h) cooperation with the department in the provision of behavioral health services under the medical assistance program; (i) audits of behavioral health programs and services; (j) promotion of activities in research and education to improve the quality of behavioral health services, recruitment and retention of behavioral health professionals, and access to behavioral health programs and services; and (k) establishment of standards for peer services, including standards for training programs and for training, certification of, and service delivery by individuals.

(2) The department shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the Nebraska Behavioral Health Services Act.

Laws 2004, LB 1083, § 6;

Laws 2006, LB 1248, § 75;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 456;

Laws 2012, LB871, § 1;

Laws 2017, LB417, § 10.